District of Columbia statutes.
31-714

Judicial review; mandamus.

(a)

Any person aggrieved by any act, determination, rule, regulation, or order or any other action of the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter may appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, in accordance with § 2-510.

(b)

The filing of an appeal pursuant to this section shall not stay the application of any such rule, regulation, order, or other action of the Mayor to the appealing party unless the court, after giving the appealing party notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines that failure to grant such a stay would be detrimental to the interest of policyholders, shareholders, creditors, or the public.

(c)

Any person aggrieved by any failure of the Mayor to act or make a determination required by this subchapter may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a writ in the nature of a mandamus or a peremptory mandamus directing the Mayor to act or make such determination forthwith.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-44, § 16, 40 DCR 6027
1981 Ed., § 35-3714.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 11-159 as subchapter II of Chapter 37 of Title 35 [subchapter II of Chapter 7 of Title 31, 2001 Ed.[, and the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in (a) and (c).